California statutes. Education Code
In the development and adoption of guidelines and procedures pursuant to this article, the governing board shall avail itself of the advice of the certificated instructional personnel in the district’s organization of certificated personnel; provided, however, that the development and adoption of guidelines pursuant to this article shall also be subject to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 7100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

44661.5.

When developing and adopting objective evaluation and assessment guidelines pursuant to Section 44660, a school district may, by mutual agreement between the exclusive representative of the certificated employees of the school district and the governing board of the school district, include any objective standards from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards or any objective standards from the California Standards for the Teaching Profession if the standards to be included are consistent with this article. If the certificated employees of the school district do not have an exclusive representative, the school district may adopt objective evaluation and assessment guidelines consistent with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44662.

(a) The governing board of each school district shall establish standards of expected pupil achievement at each grade level in each area of study.

(b) The governing board of each school district shall evaluate and assess certificated employee performance as it reasonably relates to:

(1) The progress of pupils toward the standards established pursuant to subdivision (a) and, if applicable, the state adopted academic content standards as measured by state adopted criterion referenced assessments.

(2) The instructional techniques and strategies used by the employee.

(3) The employee’s adherence to curricular objectives.

(4) The establishment and maintenance of a suitable learning environment, within the scope of the employee’s responsibilities.

(c) The governing board of each school district shall establish and define job responsibilities for certificated noninstructional personnel, including, but not limited to, supervisory and administrative personnel, whose responsibilities cannot be evaluated appropriately under the provisions of subdivision (b) and shall evaluate and assess the performance of those noninstructional certificated employees as it reasonably relates to the fulfillment of those responsibilities.

(d) Results of an employee’s participation in the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers established by Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44500) shall be made available as part of the evaluation conducted pursuant to this section.

(e) The evaluation and assessment of certificated employee performance pursuant to this section shall not include the use of publishers’ norms established by standardized tests.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed as in any way limiting the authority of school district governing boards to develop and adopt additional evaluation and assessment guidelines or criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 4.   Effective June 25, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

44663.

(a) Evaluation and assessment made pursuant to this article shall be reduced to writing and a copy thereof shall be transmitted to the certificated employee not later than 30 days before the last schoolday scheduled on the school calendar adopted by the governing board for the school year in which the evaluation takes place. The certificated employee shall have the right to initiate a written reaction or response to the evaluation. This response shall become a permanent attachment to the employee’s personnel file. Before the last schoolday scheduled on the school calendar adopted by the governing board for the school year, a meeting shall be held between the certificated employee and the evaluator to discuss the evaluation.

(b) In the case of a certificated noninstructional employee, who is employed on a 12-month basis, the evaluation and assessment made pursuant to this article shall be reduced to writing and a copy thereof shall be transmitted to the certificated employee no later than June 30 of the year in which the evaluation and assessment is made. A certificated noninstructional employee, who is employed on a 12-month basis shall have the right to initiate a written reaction or response to the evaluation. This response shall become a permanent attachment to the employee’s personnel file. Before July 30 of the year in which the evaluation and assessment takes place, a meeting shall be held between the certificated employee and the evaluator to discuss the evaluation and assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44664.

(a) Evaluation and assessment of the performance of each certificated employee shall be made on a continuing basis as follows:

(1) At least once each school year for probationary personnel.

(2) At least every other year for personnel with permanent status.

(3) At least every five years for personnel with permanent status who have been employed at least 10 years with the school district, are highly qualified, if those personnel occupy positions that are required to be filled by a highly qualified professional by the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301, et seq.), as defined in 20 U.S.C. Sec. 7801, and whose previous evaluation rated the employee as meeting or exceeding standards, if the evaluator and certificated employee being evaluated agree. The certificated employee or the evaluator may withdraw consent at any time.

(b) The evaluation shall include recommendations, if necessary, as to areas of improvement in the performance of the employee. If an employee is not performing his or her duties in a satisfactory manner according to the standards prescribed by the governing board, the employing authority shall notify the employee in writing of that fact and describe the unsatisfactory performance. The employing authority shall thereafter confer with the employee making specific recommendations as to areas of improvement in the employee’s performance and endeavor to assist the employee in his or her performance. If any permanent certificated employee has received an unsatisfactory evaluation, the employing authority shall annually evaluate the employee until the employee achieves a positive evaluation or is separated from the district.

(c) Any evaluation performed pursuant to this article which contains an unsatisfactory rating of an employee’s performance in the area of teaching methods or instruction may include the requirement that the certificated employee shall, as determined necessary by the employing authority, participate in a program designed to improve appropriate areas of the employee’s performance and to further pupil achievement and the instructional objectives of the employing authority. If a district participates in the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers established pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44500), any certificated employee who receives an unsatisfactory rating on an evaluation performed pursuant to this section shall participate in the Peer Assistance and Review Program for Teachers.

(d) Hourly and temporary hourly certificated employees, other than those employed in adult education classes who are excluded by the provisions of Section 44660, and substitute teachers may be excluded from the provisions of this section at the discretion of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 28.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

44665.

For purposes of this article, “employing authority” means the superintendent of the school district in which the employee is employed, or his designee, or in the case of a district which has no superintendent, a school principal or other person designated by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. School-Based Management and Advanced Career Opportunities for Classroom Teachers Programs [44666. - 44669.]

44666.

(a) The Legislature finds that a primary goal of every public school should be the creation of effective and productive learning environments for pupils. Increasing the educational effectiveness and productivity of public schools may require new ways of organizing instructional and adminstrative staff which increase the collective investment of all schoolsite educators in the success of their school. The Legislature also finds that innovation and change are frequently discouraged by undue administrative and organizational rigidity. The Legislature intends that the school district’s role in working with schoolsites be characterized by setting clear goals, providing sites the flexibility to achieve those goals, offering high quality technical assistance and support, and holding sites accountable for performance. The Legislature supports shifting from a rule-based system to a performance-based system of accountability. Those educators closest to pupils should be free, within limits, to create learning environments appropriate to their circumstances. The Legislature declares its intent not to diminish the leadership roles of school districts and site-level administrators. However, the Legislature does intend to encourage schools to foster more professional collaboration where teachers and principals, as an educational team, are responsible for creating the conditions that make more effective teaching and learning possible, and where schoolsite educators as a group have responsibility for the functioning and performance of their school.

It is the further intent of the Legislature to encourage and foster a shift in public school administration from a system that rigidly controls and directs what goes on at the next lowest level, to a system that guides and facilitates professionals in their quest for more productive learning opportunities for their pupils.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Hierarchical decisionmaking has tended to reduce the effectiveness and productivity of teachers in educating pupils. A more collaborative decisionmaking process may result in more effective teaching and pupil learning.

(2) A true profession should offer individuals the opportunity for growth in their careers and in their professional lives.

(3) Professional growth brings with it additional responsibilities and accountability, and taking greater responsibility allows the professional to achieve enhanced status and higher salary, and to make a contribution to the profession. 

(4) The current staffing structures and compensation structures in California school districts that emphasize seniority in setting teacher salaries and uniformity in teachers’ roles do not adequately reward teaching excellence, exceptional achievement, or the assumption of additional educational responsibilities by teachers. Neither do they provide an incentive for teachers to continue to pursue excellence.

(5) The establishment of advanced career opportunities for teachers, in conjunction with greater teacher involvement in schoolsite management, should increase the variety and responsibility of a teacher’s work. It should also provide: (A) a mechanism for restructuring salary schedules to recognize experience, additional work and responsibility; and (B) the opportunity for performance-based contracts with teachers or groups of teachers.

(6) Advanced career opportunities for teachers should also provide an incentive for teachers to remain in teaching, upgrade their skills, and improve the instructional program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44667.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage school districts to plan and implement alternative models of school-based management projects, or advanced career opportunities for classroom teachers projects, or a combination of both, for one or more schools in the district. Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that school district governing boards and administrators work with classroom teachers and teacher bargaining units to develop and strengthen procedures that increase teachers’ decisionmaking authority in responsibilities that affect their ability to teach. These procedures may include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Selection of new teachers and administrators.

(2) Evaluation of teacher and administrator performance.

(3) Selection of curricular areas for improvement.

(4) Tailoring and coordination of curriculum and instruction across grade levels and within departments at the schoolsite level.

(5) Establishment of pupil discipline policies.

(6) Design and conduct of staff development programs and policies.

(7) Assignment of pupils and scheduling of classes.

(8) Schoolwide problem solving and program development.

(9) Organization of the school for effective instruction.

(10) Development of procedures designed to institutionalize teacher involvement in decisionmaking.

(11) Determining the roles and functions of teachers, administrators, and classified employees at the school site.

(12) Development of alternative methods of teacher compensation that reward teaching excellence, exceptional achievement or the assumption of additional educational responsibilities.

(13) Establishment of policies to decentralize district decisionmaking by providing schoolsite administrators and teachers with greater budget authority including the allocation of fiscal, personnel, and other resources at the schoolsite. 

(b) Participation of school discticts in the programs established pursuant to this article shall be on a voluntary basis. A school district shall be eligible to participate only upon the approval of participation by both the governing board of the district and the exclusive representative of certificated employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44667.2.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each school district’s school-based management proposal shall include the following:

(a) A plan for involving parents in the planning, implementation, and evaluation of school restructuring efforts.

(b) A plan for staff development that shall be made available to participating school personnel in order to assist in restructuring elements specified in the district proposal.

(c) A plan for regularly assessing the progress of participating schools in meeting the goals identified in their funding proposal. Assessment plans shall include provisions for the collection of information on various school-level indicators including pupil performance, detentions, pupil and teacher absenteeism, and staff turnover. Districts are encouraged, as well, to establish a process of onsite quality reviews with the objective of evaluating the quality of instruction, leadership, staff development, and the planning and decisionmaking processes at participating schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44668.

(a) “Advanced career opportunities for classroom teachers” means a compensation system developed jointly by the governing board of a school district and the exclusive representative of certificated employees for one or more of the schools in the district that may include the following components:

(1) Extended contract days.

(2) Additional pay for additional duties or responsibilities.

(3) Differentiated staffing.

(4) Additional pay for meeting contracted performance goals.

(b) Each Advanced Career Opportunity Program shall include the following components:

(1) Fair selection procedures for job enlargement activities.

(2) An evaluation procedure developed jointly by the governing board of the district and the exclusive representative of certificated employees that provides for periodic, fair, objective, and consistent evaluation of educator performance for purposes of placement and career advancement.

(3) A plan for the periodic review of the district’s Advanced Career Opportunity Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1282, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44669.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the purposes of implementing a program established pursuant to this article, the State Board of Education may waive any part, article, or section of this code, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education that implements this code upon request by a governing board of a school district on a districtwide basis or on behalf of its schools or programs, if the governing board does both of the following:

(1)Provides written documentation that the exclusive representative of certificated employees concurs with the request. Failure of the exclusive representative of certificated employees to concur in the waiver request shall constitute cause for its denial.

(2) Demonstrates that the waiver request is necessary to implement the proposed pilot project.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to Section 51513 or Part 26 (commencing with Section 46000), other than Section 46206.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 313, Sec. 3.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Principal Evaluation System [44670. - 44671.]

44670.

(a) The governing board of a school district may identify who will conduct the evaluation of each school principal.

(b) A school principal may be evaluated annually for the first and second year of employment as a new principal in a school district. The governing board may determine the frequency at regular intervals of evaluations after this period.

(c) Additional evaluations that occur outside of the regular intervals determined by the governing board may be agreed upon between the evaluator and the principal.

(d) Evaluators and principals may review school success and
 progress throughout the year. This review should include goals that are defined by the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.   (SB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

44671.

(a) Criteria for effective school principal evaluations may be based upon the California Professional Standards for Educational Leaders. These standards identify a school administrator as being an educational leader who promotes the success of all pupils through leadership that fosters all of the following:

(1) A shared vision.

(2) Effective teaching and learning.

(3) Management and safety.

(4) Parent, family, and community involvement.

(5) Professional and ethical leadership.

(6) Contextual awareness.

(b) A school principal evaluation may include, but not be limited to, evidence of all of the following:

(1) Academic growth of pupils based on multiple measures that may include pupil work as well as pupil and school longitudinal data that demonstrates pupil academic growth over time. Assessments used for this purpose must be valid and reliable and used for the purposes intended and for the appropriate pupil populations. Local and state academic assessments include, but are not limited to, state standardized assessments, formative, summative, benchmark, end of chapter, end of course, advanced placement, international baccalaureate, college entrance, and performance assessments. For career and technical education, authentic performance
 assessment is a strong indicator of effective teaching and learning.

(2) Effective and comprehensive teacher evaluations, including, but not limited to, curricular and management leadership, ongoing professional development, teacher-principal teamwork, and professional learning communities.

(3) Culturally responsive instructional strategies to address and eliminate the achievement gap.

(4) The ability to analyze quality instructional strategies and provide effective feedback that leads to instructional improvement.

(5) High expectations for all pupils and leadership to ensure active pupil engagement and learning.

(6) Collaborative professional practices for improving instructional
 strategies.

(7) Effective school management, including personnel and resource management, organizational leadership, sound fiscal practices, a safe campus environment, and appropriate pupil behavior.

(8) Meaningful self-assessment to improve as a professional educator. Self-assessment may include, but not be limited to, a self-assessment on state professional standards for educational leaders and the identification of areas of strengths and areas for professional growth to engage in activities to foster professional growth.

(9) Consistent and effective relationships with pupils, parents, teachers, staff, and other administrators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.   (SB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.1. School Personnel Staff Development and Resource Centers [44681. - 44690.1.]



  ARTICLE 3. Administrator Training and Evaluation [44681. - 44689.]

44681.

The Legislature recognizes that the principal plays a pivotal role in the life of a school. Research indicates that at schools where pupil achievement is higher than might be expected, principals provide strong leadership and support. Teachers at these schools report that their principals facilitate innovation, support teachers in efforts to promote new ideas, and assist staff to acquire needed skills and materials. Other studies show that the principal is the most effective agent for bringing about educational improvement.

The Legislature further recognizes that although principal leadership is essential to effective instruction, research shows that many principals are neither prepared nor encouraged to be educational leaders. According to principals and others, administrator training does not always match responsibilities of the job, and opportunities for continuing development are inadequate.

The Legislature, by the provisions of this article, intends to provide site and central district administrators ongoing opportunities to improve their management and leadership skills. The Legislature intends that administrator support and development activities funded by this article will result in direct improvements in services to California public school pupils. The Legislature further intends that current funding for duplicative educational programs be redirected to fund the provisions of this article.

It is also the intention of the Legislature to enhance the desirability of teaching as a profession by promoting a school environment that facilitates a constructive working relationship between teachers and administrators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 363, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44682.

(a) Any school district, county superintendent of schools, or consortium of those entities shall be eligible for funds in order to establish an administrator training and evaluation program, which shall provide to school administrators support and development activities designed to improve clinical supervision skills.

(b) In order to receive funding for an administrator training and evaluation program, a school district, county superintendent, or consortium shall:

(1) Develop a three-year plan for support and development activities, based on a systematic assessment of unmet needs of pupils and school personnel in the districts to be served.

(2) Operate the program in conjunction with the teacher education and computer center which serves the school district or county office of education or, in the case of a program operated by a consortium, operate the program in conjunction with one or more teacher education and computer centers which serves a school district or county office of education in the consortium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 35.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44683.

(a) The three-year plan developed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44682 shall address, but need not be limited to, objectives identified pursuant to Sections 44670.4, 52014, and 52015, and the capacity of site and central district administrators to provide leadership necessary to do the following:

(1) Improve instructional, management, human development, and counseling skills.

(2) Ensure that curricula, instruction, and materials are keyed to the educational needs of each pupil, with particular emphasis on pupils who have not achieved proficiency in basic reading, writing, and computational skills, limited and non-English speaking pupils, disadvantaged pupils, and pupils with exceptional abilities or needs.

(3) Develop curricula and instructional materials in a wide variety of areas such as arts and humanities and physical, natural, and social sciences.

(4) Promote, facilitate, and ensure active participation of the school staff in the school decisionmaking process, and collaboration among the school staff, and among the staff and members of the school community, in the educational and administrative planning, implementing, and evaluating of the school program.

(5) Improve the school and classroom environment, including relationships between and among pupils, school personnel, and community members, including parents.

(6) Make available followup activities to assist participating individuals in using newly acquired skills on the job.

(b) Each three-year plan shall describe the following:

(1) General staff development objectives and steps necessary to achieve the objectives in subdivision (a), including intended outcomes.

(2) A proposed budget.

(3) Procedures for ongoing evaluation and modification of training activities, including evaluation on a continuing basis by participating administrators and outside personnel as necessary.

(c) Administrator training and evaluation programs shall be designed and implemented under the direction of participating school and district administrators, including the district administrators or administrators responsible for supervision of curriculum and instruction, and in cooperation with teacher training institutions. The programs shall allow for diversity in development activities, including, but not limited to, small groups, self-directed learning, and systematic observation during visits to other schools.

The district administrator or administrators responsible for curriculum and instruction, or other central district administrators shall be included as active participants in one or more staff development activities pursuant to this article whenever appropriate.

The amendments made to Section 44681 and to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of this section by the Statutes of 1986 shall be applicable only to three-year plans developed on or after January 1, 1987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 363, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

44684.

Administrator training and evaluation programs shall set aside specific times throughout the school year to conduct programs. The times shall include, but not be limited to, periods when participating administrators are released from their regular duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 37.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44685.

Any school district governing board, upon petition by a majority of the administrators designated to design an administrator training and evaluation program, may request the State Board of Education to grant a waiver of any provision of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 38.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44686.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1388, Sec. 4.   Effective September 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

44687.

The State Department of Education may provide technical assistance, at the request of any entity involved in establishing and implementing an administrator training and evaluation program. At the request of the Legislature, the department shall assess the effectiveness of the training provided by administrator training and evaluation programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 39.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44688.

(a) Federal and state funds appropriated or apportioned for the purposes of this article shall not be used to supplant funds currently expended by school districts for the purpose of administering or conducting staff development programs.

(b) Priority in funding shall be given to applicants who provide evidence of the following:

(1) Programs designed to strengthen clinical supervision skills of site administrators.

(2) Specific substantial district support to implement proposed administrator development activities.

(3) A high degree of collaborative planning of proposed activities among school principals, and between principals and central district administrators.

(4) A process to continue a high degree of collaboration among school principals and between principals and central district administrators in implementing, evaluating, and modifying development activities funded by this article and other state education programs.

(5) A direct relationship between proposed activities and specific school improvement goals developed pursuant to an existing or new process which involves principals, central district administrators, teachers, other school personnel, secondary students, and parents.

(c) Lowest funding priority shall be given to programs designed for the primary purpose of granting a degree or a credential to participating staff.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 40.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

44689.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the administrator training and evaluation programs be funded annually in each Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 41.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Evaluation of Certificated Employees [44689.1. - 44689.2.]

44689.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Strong schoolsite administrators play a pivotal role in the life of a school and are essential for successful schools. The principal, as leader of the schoolsite educational team, is the most effective agent for bringing about educational improvement.

(2) An important component of effective leadership is evaluation of employees.

(3) Training in effective evaluation strategies and techniques that supports instructional improvement is essential.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that administrators assigned to evaluate certificated employees possess certain demonstrated competencies in assessment of employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 935, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44689.2.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, with the approval of the State Board of Education, award a grant to any eligible applicant school district, county office of education, or charter school, for the purpose of providing necessary administrator training pursuant to this article. The grant shall consist of an amount not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) per administrator scheduled to receive training as set forth in this article.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall administer this article and shall, where necessary, implement actions of the State Board of Education governing the implementation of this article.

(c) (1) Programs funded pursuant to this section shall include all of the following:

(A) Techniques and strategies for successful supervision, observation, diagnosis, and conferencing with teachers that support instructional improvement.

(B) Documentation and writing techniques necessary for effective written evaluations.

(C) A knowledge of evaluation, assessment, and dismissal procedures pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 44660) of Chapter 3 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 44930) of Chapter 4.

(2) The programs shall provide sufficient flexibility to meet the needs of the state’s diverse school districts.

(3) The programs shall set forth the sources for appropriate professional development, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s Principal Leadership Institute pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 92855) of Part 57, onsite training offered by practitioners and consulting experts, and academies offered by professional associations.

(d) This article shall not be implemented during any fiscal year for which funds have not been appropriated for these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 935, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. 21st Century California School Leadership Academy [44690. - 44690.1.]

44690.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Skilled school and school district leaders are critical for building a strong and stable workforce, and for making the important shifts in practice envisioned by the local control funding formula and the Common Core State Standards.

(2) Strong leadership is a key predictor of pupil achievement, and highly skilled leadership is critical to successful improvement efforts for local educational agencies and schools.

(3) The roles of principals and other school leaders have evolved considerably since the California School Leadership Academy was first established more than
 three decades ago, with a broad range of knowledge, skills, and competencies needed to successfully support success for the diverse learners served in California public schools.

(4) Focused investments in leadership development for principals and other school leaders will benefit pupils and staff at California’s public schools and, ultimately, improve outcomes for pupils.

(b) The 21st Century California School Leadership Academy is hereby established.

(c) (1) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall establish a process, administered by the department, to organize and offer professional learning opportunities, and to select, subject to approval by the executive director of the state board, providers of high-quality professional learning for administrators
 and other school leaders to receive grants in a manner that ensures the availability of professional learning through the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy, free of charge, to local educational agencies that receive federal Title II funds on a statewide basis.

(2) In designing professional learning opportunities and in selecting grantees pursuant to this section, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall ensure that professional learning provided through the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy includes all of the following:

(A) Training and coaching for principals and other school leaders in critical areas identified by the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in consultation with the executive director of the state board.

(B) Training mentors for novice principals and teachers.

(C) Training coaches to support leaders in high-need settings.

(D) Training for central office leaders, principals, and other school leaders, including teacher leaders, involved in school improvement efforts.

(3) Professional learning opportunities may include, but are not necessarily limited to, coaching and training around supporting effective standards-aligned instruction and other instruction that promotes critical thinking, inclusive practices, social-emotional learning, restorative practices and other alternative behavioral programs, implementing effective language acquisition programs for English learners, strategies for addressing performance gaps among pupil groups, leveraging wraparound services to support healthy development of pupils,
 civic engagement, building collegial environments, effectively engaging parents and guardians, and using resources provided by the department related to the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress system established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 of Division 4, such as formative or interim assessments, to improve outcomes for pupils.

(4) In designing and offering professional learning opportunities and in selecting grantees pursuant to this section, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall ensure that professional learning is provided through the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy in a manner that is consistent with the statewide system of support pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division 4.

(d) Grantees
 eligible to be selected pursuant to this section shall be limited to local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, and nonprofit educational services providers.

(e) Priority for professional learning through this program may be given to school districts and county offices of education eligible to receive differentiated assistance pursuant to Sections 52071 and 52071.5 and schools identified for comprehensive support as described in Section 1003(e)(1)(B) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act.

(f) (1) Grants shall be awarded for a term not to exceed three years.

(2) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall evaluate the professional learning opportunities offered or funded through the 21st Century California School Leadership Academy for
 their effectiveness. The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall establish criteria and measures to assess the performance of the grantees in performing the duties specified in this section. When performing these activities, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may enter into appropriate contracts to assist with program evaluation, as necessary.

(3) At the conclusion of each grant term, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence
 may renew the selection of the grantees or reopen the selection process in a manner consistent with subdivision (c).

(4) Before renewing the selection of a grantee, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall evaluate the grantee’s performance relative to the criteria and measures established pursuant to paragraph (2) and the grantee’s success in fulfilling the purposes of this section.

(g) Grantees receiving funds pursuant to this section shall provide program information to, and as needed by, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence as a condition of receiving the
 funds, including participating in any external evaluation coordinated by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 56.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44690.1.
